Washington statutes.
RCW 18.08.510

Registration and authorization fee—Building code council account.

(1) There is imposed a fee of six dollars and fifty cents on each certificate of registration, renewal of a certificate of registration, certificate of authorization, and renewal of a certificate of authorization, issued by the director. The director must collect this fee and must quarterly remit moneys collected under this subsection to the state treasury.

(2) The fee established by subsection (1) of this section is in addition to other fees authorized by this chapter and prescribed by the director under RCW 43.24.086.

(3) All moneys collected under subsection (1) of this section must be deposited into the building code council account in the state treasury.

[ 2018 c 207 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 207 ss 9 and 10: "Sections 9 and 10 of this act take effect October 1, 2018." [ 2018 c 207 s 12.]